Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.010

Statement of intent.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature that the following provisions be enacted for the purpose of establishing and providing for the operation of a program of state assistance to school districts in providing school plant facilities.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.050. Prior: 1947 c 278 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4940-12. Formerly RCW 28A.47.050, 28.47.050.]